Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1151.5 Use of vacant public school
facilities. (a) When the department considers whether to close any
particular public school, it shall simultaneously give reasonable consideration
to making all or portions of the facilities of the public school available to
charter schools and pre-plus programs; provided that the facilities may be used
for any other purpose the board deems appropriate.

(b) The department shall identify unused
public school facilities that may be appropriate for:

(1) Charter schools;

(2) Early learning programs, such as the pre-plus
program; and

(3) Any other purpose the board deems appropriate.

Suitable empty classrooms, as determined by the
department, shall be inventoried for potential use by charter schools, early
learning programs, such as the pre-plus program, or for any other purpose the
board deems appropriate. Priority shall be given to facilities on sites with
sufficient space for three or more classrooms.

(c) The
department shall adopt rules necessary to
carry out the purposes of this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, "public
school" means any school that falls within the definition of public
schools in section 302A-101, except for charter schools.

[(e)] Upon receipt of a notice pursuant to
subsection (b), the executive office on early learning shall solicit
applications from pre-plus programs interested in using and occupying all or
portions of the facilities of the public school and submit a prioritized list
of pre-plus programs to the department for final determination of which
pre-plus program, if any, shall be authorized to use and occupy the public
school facilities. [L 2010, c 144, §2; am L 2012, c 130, §10 as superseded by c
133, §22 and c 178, §4]

Note

In subsection (e), the reference to subsection (b) is to
former subsection (b) that was deleted by L 2012, c 133, §22.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next